Utah statutes.
53A-10-105.   Evaluation orientation.

(1)  The principal of each school shall orient all educators assigned to the school concerning the school board's educator evaluation program, including the purpose of the evaluations and the method used to evaluate.

(2)  Evaluations may not occur prior to the orientation by the principal.

